Utah, session 2026, HB558.
Section 1. Section 20A-9-203.5 is amended to read:20A-9-203.5. Requirement to post candidate information on website.The clerk of a county or a municipality(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), an election officer shall, within three business days after the day on which the clerkelection officer accepts a declaration of candidacy, post the following information on the election officer's website of the county or municipality:(1)(a)the name and campaign contact information of the candidate; and(2)(b)the office that the candidate is seeking.; and(c)regardless of whether the office sought by the candidate is a partisan or nonpartisan office:(i)the political party with which the candidate is affiliated; or(ii)if the candidate is not affiliated with a political party, that the candidate is not affiliated with a political party.(2)(a)For an election officer who does not have a website, the election officer shall, within three business days after the day on which the election officer accepts a declaration of candidacy, publish the information described in Subsection (1) on the Utah Public Notice Website.(b)Subsection (1) does not apply to a candidate in a retention election described in Chapter 12, Selection and Election of Judges.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.